Massachusetts, session 194th, H1741.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35 of Massachusetts General Law Chapter 123 shall hereby be
amended by striking the current language, "Any police officer, physician, spouse, blood relative,
guardian or court official may petition in writing any district court or any division of the juvenile
court department for an order of commitment of a person whom he has reason to believe has an
alcohol or substance use disorder;" and inserting in place thereof the following language: "Any
police officer, physician, spouse, blood relative, guardian, court official, Licensed Alcohol and
Drug Counselor (I or II), or Licensed Social Worker may petition in writing any district court, or
any division of the juvenile court department for an order of commitment of a person whom they
have reason to believe has an alcohol or substance use disorder."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1